Hawaii statutes.
§142-69 Stallions. Every person on
whose land any stallion of twelve months old or upwards is found trespassing,
may, without any notice, cause the stallion to be impounded, and the owner
shall pay to the person upon whose land the trespass is committed $10 for every
trespass, to be collected by the pound keeper as provided by any ordinance
relating thereto. [L 1907, c 125, §17; RL 1925, §705; RL 1935, §283; RL 1945,
§1089; RL 1955, §20-68; HRS §142-69]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next